Louisiana, session 2026, HB561.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1263.5 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1263.5. Definitions; unpaid leave for organ donors; guarantee of continued
employment
A. As used in this Section, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Employee" means a person who performs services for hire for an
employer, for an average of twenty or more hours per week, and includes all
individuals employed at any site owned or operated by an employer. Employee does
not include an independent contractor.
(2) "Employer" means a person or entity that employs twenty or more
employees at at least one site and includes an individual, corporation, partnership,
association, nonprofit organization, group of persons, state, parish, town, city, school
district, or other governmental subdivision.
B. An employer shall grant an unpaid leave of absence to an employee who
seeks to undergo a medical procedure to donate a living organ. The combined length
of the leave shall be determined by the employee, but may not exceed one hundred
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-892 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 561
and sixty work hours, unless agreed to by the employer. The employer may require
verification by a healthcare professional, such as a physician or nurse practitioner,
of the purpose and length of each leave requested by the employee to donate a living
organ.
C. An employer shall not terminate or otherwise retaliate against an
employee for requesting or obtaining a leave of absence as provided by this Section.
D. This Section does not prevent an employer from providing leave for
living organ donation in addition to leave allowed in accordance with this Section.
This Section does not affect an employee's rights with respect to any other
employment benefit.